Florida, session 2026, HB1433.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Economic Self-
Sufficiency for Working Individuals with Disabilities."
Section 2. Section 409.9141, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
409.9141 Medicaid buy-in program for working individuals
with disabilities.—
(1)(a) Contingent upon federal approval through a Medicaid
waiver or a state plan amendment, the agency shall implement and
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1433-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1433 2026
administer a Medicaid buy-in program, authorized under the
Ticket to Work and Work Incentives Improvement Act of 1999, Pub.
L. No. 106-170, and the Balanced Budget Act of 1997, Pub. L. No.
105-33, for individuals with disabilities who are between 18 and
64 years of age who work and whose incomes exceed the maximum
income eligibility level for initial enrollment to obtain
coverage for medical assistance under the Medicaid program. The
agency shall determine the new income eligibility level for such
individuals.
(b) The Medicaid buy-in program under paragraph (a) must
provide full Medicaid benefits to eligible individuals and must
limit any premiums or cost sharing to a percentage, as
determined by the agency, of an eligible individual's income.
(2) By October 1, 2026, the agency shall seek federal
approval through a Medicaid waiver or a state plan amendment as
necessary to implement the Medicaid buy-in program under this
section. The agency shall implement and administer the Medicaid
buy-in program upon receiving federal approval.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1433-00